Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,164
Nail technology home services permit; owner; responsibility.

The owner of each salon holding a nail technology home services permit shall have full responsibility for ensuring that the nail technology home services are provided in compliance with all applicable laws and rules and regulations and shall be liable for any violations which occur.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 84;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,235;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 426.